North Dakota, session 69, SB2153.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 9 of section 61-02-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
9. "Project" means a water conveyance project or any one of the works defined in
subsection 1011, or any combination of such works, which are physically connected or jointly
managed and operated as a single unit.

S. B. NO. 2153 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2153.
Senate Vote: Yeas 44 Nays 0 Absent 3
House Vote: Yeas 91 Nays 1 Absent 2
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State